en: Audio conversion direction: Analog to Analog (A/A); Analog to Digital (A/D); Bidirectional (A/D & D/A); Digital to Analog (D/A); Digital to Digital (D/D); Other
ja: オーディオ変換方向: アナログからアナログ（A/A）; アナログからデジタル（A/D）; 双方向（A/D & D/A）; デジタルからアナログ（D/A）; デジタルからデジタル（D/D）; その他
ru: Направление аудиопреобразования: Аналоговый в аналоговый (A/A); Аналоговый в цифровой (A/D); Двунаправленный (A/D и D/A); Цифровой в аналоговый (D/A); Цифровой в цифровой (D/D); Другой
ko: 오디오 변환 방향: 아날로그에서 아날로그 (A/A); 아날로그에서 디지털 (A/D); 양방향 (A/D & D/A); 디지털에서 아날로그 (D/A); 디지털에서 디지털 (D/D); 기타
lt-LT: Garso konvertavimo kryptis: Analoginis į analoginį (A/A); Analoginis į skaitmeninį (A/D); Dvikryptis (A/D ir D/A); Skaitmeninis į analoginį (D/A); Skaitmeninis į skaitmeninį (D/D); Kita
cs: Směr audio konverze: Analogové na analogové (A/A); Analogové na digitální (A/D); Obousměrné (A/D a D/A); Digitální na analogové (D/A); Digitální na digitální (D/D); Jiné
hr-HR: Smjer audio konverzije: Analogno u analogno (A/A); Analogno u digitalno (A/D); Dvosmjerno (A/D i D/A); Digitalno u analogno (D/A); Digitalno u digitalno (D/D); Ostalo
vi: Hướng chuyển đổi âm thanh: Tương tự sang tương tự (A/A); Tương tự sang kỹ thuật số (A/D); Hai chiều (A/D & D/A); Kỹ thuật số sang tương tự (D/A); Kỹ thuật số sang kỹ thuật số (D/D); Khác
hu: Audioátalakítás iránya: Analógról analógra (A/A); Analógról digitálisra (A/D); Kétirányú (A/D és D/A); Digitálisról analógra (D/A); Digitálisról digitálisra (D/D); Egyéb
pl: Kierunek konwersji audio: Analogowy na analogowy (A/A); Analogowy na cyfrowy (A/D); Dwukierunkowy (A/D i D/A); Cyfrowy na analogowy (D/A); Cyfrowy na cyfrowy (D/D); Inne
da: Lydkonverteringsretning: Analog til analog (A/A); Analog til digital (A/D); Tovejs (A/D & D/A); Digital til analog (D/A); Digital til digital (D/D); Andet
fr: Direction de conversion audio: Analogique vers analogique (A/A); Analogique vers numérique (A/N); Bidirectionnel (A/N et N/A); Numérique vers analogique (N/A); Numérique vers numérique (N/N); Autre
bg-BG: Посока на аудиопреобразуване: Аналогов към аналогов (A/A); Аналогов към дигитален (A/D); Двупосочен (A/D и D/A); Дигитален към аналогов (D/A); Дигитален към дигитален (D/D); Други
sv: Ljudkonverteringsriktning: Analog till analog (A/A); Analog till digital (A/D); Dubbelriktad (A/D & D/A); Digital till analog (D/A); Digital till digital (D/D); Övrigt
pt-PT: Direção da conversão de áudio: Analógico para analógico (A/A); Analógico para digital (A/D); Bidirecional (A/D e D/A); Digital para analógico (D/A); Digital para digital (D/D); Outro
nl: Audioconversierichting: Analoog naar analoog (A/A); Analoog naar digitaal (A/D); Bidirectioneel (A/D & D/A); Digitaal naar analoog (D/A); Digitaal naar digitaal (D/D); Andere
sl-SI: Smer avdio pretvorbe: Analogno v analogno (A/A); Analogno v digitalno (A/D); Dvosmerno (A/D in D/A); Digitalno v analogno (D/A); Digitalno v digitalno (D/D); Drugo
it: Direzione di conversione audio: Da analogico ad analogico (A/A); Da analogico a digitale (A/D); Bidirezionale (A/D e D/A); Da digitale ad analogico (D/A); Da digitale a digitale (D/D); Altro
es: Dirección de conversión de audio: Analógico a analógico (A/A); Analógico a digital (A/D); Bidireccional (A/D y D/A); Digital a analógico (D/A); Digital a digital (D/D); Otros
de: Konvertierungsrichtung: Analog zu Analog (A/A); Analog zu Digital (A/D); Bidirektional (A/D & D/A); Digital zu Analog (D/A); Digital zu Digital (D/D); Sonstiges
zh-TW: 音訊轉換方向: 類比轉類比（A/A）; 類比轉數位（A/D）; 雙向（A/D 和 D/A）; 數位轉類比（D/A）; 數位轉數位（D/D）; 其他
th: ทิศทางการแปลงเสียง: อนาล็อกเป็นอนาล็อก (A/A); อนาล็อกเป็นดิจิทัล (A/D); สองทิศทาง (A/D & D/A); ดิจิทัลเป็นอนาล็อก (D/A); ดิจิทัลเป็นดิจิทัล (D/D); อื่นๆ
nb: Retning for audiokonvertering: Analog til analog (A/A); Analog til digital (A/D); Toveis (A/D og D/A); Digital til analog (D/A); Digital til digital (D/D); Annet
zh-CN: 音频转换方向: 模拟转模拟 (A/A); 模拟转数字 (A/D); 双向（A/D 和 D/A）; 数字转模拟 (D/A); 数字转数字 (D/D); 其他
tr: Ses dönüştürme yönü: Analogdan analoga (A/A); Analogdan dijitale (A/D); Çift yönlü (A/D & D/A); Dijitalden analoga (D/A); Dijitalden dijitale (D/D); Diğer
el: Κατεύθυνση μετατροπής ήχου: Αναλογικό σε αναλογικό (A/A); Αναλογικό σε ψηφιακό (A/D); Αμφίδρομο (A/D & D/A); Ψηφιακό σε αναλογικό (D/A); Ψηφιακό σε ψηφιακό (D/D); Άλλο
sk-SK: Smer audio konverzie: Analógový na analógový (A/A); Analógový na digitálny (A/D); Obojsmerný (A/D a D/A); Digitálny na analógový (D/A); Digitálny na digitálny (D/D); Iné
pt-BR: Direção da conversão de áudio: Analógico para analógico (A/A); Analógico para digital (A/D); Bidirecional (A/D e D/A); Digital para analógico (D/A); Digital para digital (D/D); Outro
fi: Audiomuunnoksen suunta: Analoginen analogiseksi (A/A); Analoginen digitaaliseksi (A/D); Kaksisuuntainen (A/D & D/A); Digitaalinen analogiseksi (D/A); Digitaalinen digitaaliseksi (D/D); Muu
ro-RO: Direcția de conversie audio: Analogic la analogic (A/A); Analogic la digital (A/D); Bidirecțional (A/D & D/A); Digital la analogic (D/A); Digital la digital (D/D); Altele